District of Columbia statutes.
16-4601.02

Proceedings governed by other law.

This chapter does not govern a proceeding pertaining to:

(1)

The authorization of emergency medical care for a child;

(2)

An adoption proceeding pursuant to § 16-301; or

(3)

A proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child pursuant to § 16-909(b-2).

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-233, § 2(c), 59 DCR 14769

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-233 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 103 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).